California, session 20252026, AB1179.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14552 of the Financial Code is amended to read:14552. The supervisory committee shall, within seven business days after suspension of any or all members of the credit committee, or any member of the board of directors, or any other officer, cause notice of a special meeting to be given to the members to take such action regarding the suspension as the members deem necessary.